New Jersey, session 222, S2660.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    No person shall sell, offer for sale, distribute, import, or manufacture any jewelry containing more than 0.03 percent cadmium by weight. 2.    A manufacturer, distributor, or importer of jewelry shall issue an immediate recall for any jewelry that is discovered to contain more than 0.03 percent cadmium by weight. 3.    The Director of Consumer Affairs shall issue an immediate recall for any jewelry that the director determines contains more than 0.03 percent cadmium by weight. 4.    a.  Within 48 hours of receiving notice from the Director of Consumer Affairs or a manufacturer, distributor, or importer that jewelry has been recalled because it contains more than 0.03 percent cadmium by weight, a retail mercantile establishment shall remove the jewelry from any display and make it unavailable for purchase. b.    Within 14 business days of receiving notice from the Director of Consumer Affairs or a manufacturer, distributor, or importer that jewelry has been recalled because it contains more than 0.03 percent cadmium by weight, a retail mercantile establishment shall return all inventory of that jewelry to the manufacturer, distributor, or importer from which it was obtained, at the cost of the manufacturer, distributor, or importer. 5.    Within 60 business days of receiving jewelry that has been recalled because it contains more than 0.03 percent cadmium by weight from a retail mercantile establishment, the manufacturer, distributor, or importer shall dispose of the jewelry in a manner and location designed to remove it from access by the general public, and in accordance with any applicable laws governing the disposal of products containing cadmium. 6.    A person who knowingly violates the provisions of this act shall be guilty of an unlawful practice pursuant to P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.). 7.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month following enactment.